Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
ADMINISTRATIVE REVOCATION PROCESS

Rules of Court

See Hawaii Court Records Rules.

Case Notes

Administrative revocation (AR) of petitioner's driver's
license reversed where hearing officer erred in considering the unsworn
statements of the stopping officer that were included in the sworn police
report of the arresting officer in determining that the police had reasonable
suspicion to stop petitioner's car. The statutory scheme reveals the
legislature's intent that sworn statements be submitted by police and other
government officers playing crucial roles in the AR process and the importance
the legislature placed on sworn statements by the officers as a means of
ensuring the reliability of their statements and evidence used in the AR process.
130 H. 74 (App.), 305 P.3d 490 (2013).

Due process rights not violated by administrative driver's
license revocation hearing procedure where defendant was afforded a hearing
where witnesses were called and defendant was represented by counsel, and hearing
office advised counsel of the procedure that hearing officer was going to
follow. 108 H. 31, 116 P.3d 673.

§291E-31 Notice of administrative
revocation; effect. As used in this part, the notice of administrative
revocation:

(1) Establishes that the respondent's license and
privilege to operate a vehicle in the State or on or in the waters of the State
shall be terminated:

(A) Thirty days after the date the notice of
administrative revocation is issued in the case of an alcohol related offense;

(B) Forty-four days after the date the notice
of administrative revocation is issued in the case of a drug related offense;
or

(C) Such later date as is established by the
director under section 291E-38,

if the director administratively revokes the respondent's
license and privilege;

(2) Establishes the date on which administrative
revocation proceedings against the respondent were initiated;

(3) Serves as a temporary permit, if applicable, to
operate a vehicle as provided in section 291E-33; and

(4) Notifies the respondent that the respondent shall
obtain an ignition interlock permit and keep an ignition interlock device
installed and operating in any vehicle the respondent operates during the
revocation period if the respondent had a valid license at the time of the
arrest. [L 2000, c 189, pt of §23; am L 2001, c 157, §13; am L 2006, c 201, §2;
am L 2010, c 166, §11; am L 2012, c 327, §9]

Case Notes

The administrative director of the courts (director) may not,
in an administrative hearing filed pursuant to §291E-38, consider an offense
occurring after the notice of administrative revocation has been issued under
this section, as a basis for increasing an administrative revocation period
already determined on administrative review by the director under §§291E-37 and
291E-41. 108 H. 350, 120 P.3d 249.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next